Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2309
Release or disposition of personal property; liability of landlord.

(1) If the landlord releases to the former tenant property which remains on the premises after a tenancy is terminated, the landlord shall not be liable to any person with respect to such property.

(2) If the landlord releases property pursuant to section 69-2307 to a person who is not the former tenant and who is reasonably believed by the landlord to be the owner of the property, the landlord shall not be liable with respect to such property to:

(a) Any person to whom notice was given pursuant to section 69-2303; and

(b) Any person to whom notice was not given pursuant to section 69-2303 unless such person proves that, prior to releasing the property, the landlord believed or reasonably should have believed that such person had an interest in the property and also that the landlord knew or should, upon reasonable investigation, have known the address of such person.

(3) When property is disposed of pursuant to section 69-2308, the landlord shall not be liable with respect to that property to:

(a) Any person to whom notice was given pursuant to section 69-2303; and

(b) Any person to whom notice was not given pursuant to section 69-2303 unless such person proves that, prior to disposing of the property pursuant to section 69-2308, the landlord believed or reasonably should have believed that such person had an interest in the property and also that the landlord knew or should, upon reasonable investigation, have known the address of such person.

Laws 1991, LB 36, § 9.